Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6503
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act, the definitions found in sections 77-6504 to 77-6515 shall be used.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 46.